Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson: NASDAQ:ERIC quotes & news - Google FinanceMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreDocsBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceTelefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson(NASDAQ:ERIC)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson  (Public, NASDAQ:ERIC)  
Watch this stock
 




















6.28


-0.05
(-0.79%)





Real-time:
 

11:00AM EDT



NASDAQ
real-time data -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD







Range

6.28 - 6.36



52 week

4.83 - 7.55



Open

6.35



Vol / Avg.

778,981.00/5.77M



Mkt cap

21.02B



P/E

    -



Div/yield

0.11/1.77



EPS

-0.52



Shares

3.01B



Beta

1.04



Inst. own

16%
































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q2 (Jun '17)
2016


Net profit margin
-1.99%
0.85%

Operating margin
-2.47%
2.83%

EBITD margin
-
10.70%

Return on average assets
-1.41%
0.67%

Return on average equity
-3.25%
1.20%

Employees
109,127
-

CDP Score
-

B


Screen stocks with similar metrics »

Address
Torshamnsgatan 21KISTA, 164 40Sweden+46-10-7190000 (Phone)

Website links


http://www.ericsson.com



External links

Analyst Estimates - MarketWatch
SEC Filings - EDGAR Online
Major Holders - MSN Money
Research Reports - Reuters
Transcripts - SeekingAlpha















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view



Volume delayed by 15 mins.Prices are not from all markets.

Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel







Sector: Technology > Industry: Communications & Networking - NEC

More from FactSet »










Description




Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson (Ericsson) provides infrastructure, services and software to the telecommunication industry and other sectors. The Company's segments include Networks, IT & Cloud and Media. The Networks segment consists of two business units: Network Products and Network Services. The overall focus is on evolving and managing access networks, including the development of hardware and software for radio access and transport networks. The IT & Cloud business includes two business units: IT & Cloud Products and IT & Cloud Services. The focus in IT & Cloud is to help telecom operators and selected enterprises through the digital transformations ahead. It develops and delivers software-based solutions for television and media and combines a product portfolio that spans the television value chain, with systems integration and managed services. The portfolio includes compression, content publishing through set-top box or pure over-the-top, content delivery and analytics.


More from Reuters »








Officers and directors





Leif Johansson

Independent Chairman of the Board





Age: 66

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Borje E. Ekholm

President, Chief Executive Officer, Director





Age: 54

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Helena Stjernholm

Deputy Chairman of the Board





Age: 47

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Jacob Wallenberg

Deputy Chairman of the Board





Age: 61

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Jan Frykhammar

Executive Vice President, Advisor to the Chief Executive Officer





Age: 52

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Magnus Mandersson

Executive Vice President and Advisor to the Chief Executive Officer





Age: 58

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Carl Mellander

Senior Vice President, Finance & Common Functions





Age: 53

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Niklas Heuveldop

Senior Vice President, Chief Strategy Officer, Head of Technology & Emerging Business at Ericsson, Acting Head of Market Area North America





Age: 49

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Helena Norrman

Senior Vice President, Chief Marketing and Communications Officer and Head of Group Function Marketing and Communications





Age: 47

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Nina Macpherson

Senior Vice President, Chief Legal Officer, Head of Group Function Legal Affairs, Secretary to the Board of Directors





Age: 59

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters



Full list on Reuters »








Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service





 Ericsson - A world of communication

















































Skip to content

Go to main navigation
Go to language selector








Ok
				This website uses cookies. If you continue to browse the site, we assume you are fine with how we use cookies on the web.
				Read More











Search freetext












Worldwide - en
   






Menu
More













One network for a million needs
Success for operators is built on a flexible and efficient infrastructure that enables millions of different use cases. Our network solutions help operators build offerings towards new value chains, support millions of different services and devices and work perfectly – where ever people want to connect.
Learn more about Networks

















Master the Digital Era with Programmable Platforms
Build an IT Platform that can help you boost both profitability and relevance in this customer-centric digital era.
Learn more about Ericsson IT

















Media – Entering the internet era of television
The emergence of the Networked Society is re-shaping all industries and empowering the consumer like never before. Mobility, broadband and cloud are the primary enablers of change where 15 billion connected; video enabled devices by 2020 will drive an appetite for video that will create unprecedented challenges and opportunities.
Learn more about Media

















Industries
The front-runners in industries like Utilities, Transport, Public Safety, Commercial & Industrial Real Estate and Mobile Financial Services, are starting to shift information and communications technologies from the backroom to the boardroom, from support act to main stage.
Learn about our Industry solutions

















Portfolio
Welcome to Ericsson portfolio with products, systems and solutions which enable communication for telecom operators, government media, utility and transport industries.
All Ericsson's offerings






















5G


5G will enable organizations to move into the new markets and build new revenue streams with radically new business models and use cases.

5G








Cloud


Cloud technologies bring unprecedented agility, efficiency and accessibility to IT environments in every industry.

Cloud








IoT


We are experts in IoT connectivity and security. Launch IoT safer, faster and more efficiently with our platform and accelerate your business.

Internet of Things










Welcome to the Networked Society
An extraordinary revolution is transforming our world. Real-time connectivity – from connected cars to personal wearables to smart grid technology – is fundamentally changing the way we innovate, collaborate, produce, govern and live sustainably.
Learn more about the Networked Society


















Close





Angola - enArgentina - es,enAustralia - enBangladesh - enBhutan - enBotswana - enBrazil - pt,enBrunei - enCameroon - en,frCanada - en,frChile - es,enChina - zh,enColombia - es,enCongo (DRC) - en,frCosta Rica - es,enCuba - enEl Salvador - enFrance - fr,enGermany - de,enGhana - enGuatemala - enHaiti - enHong Kong - enIndia - enIndonesia - enItaly - it,enIvory Coast - en,frJamaica - enJapan - en,jaKenya - enMalaysia - enMalta - enMexico - es,enMyanmar (Burma) - enNepal - enNew Zealand - enNigeria - enPanama - enParaguay - enPeru - enPhilippines - enPuerto Rico - enRussia - ru,enRwanda - enSenegal - en,frSingapore - enSouth Africa - enSpain - es,enSri Lanka - enSuriname - enSweden - sv,enSwitzerland - enTaiwan - zh,enTanzania - enThailand - enTurkey - tr,enUganda - enUkraine - enUnited States - enVenezuela - enVietnam - en 
Ericsson worldwide



















MORE THAN ONE MILLION PER DAY
Subscribers are increasing daily on the mobile internet 
Get the latest Ericsson Mobility Report








{ Markettagged:True , MatchedLanguageCode:True }






In focus 










Getting physical with 5G

Take an inside look at the physical layer design of the 5G New Radio with our latest Ericsson Technology Review article.










AI – a consumer’s best friend?

What if you had a personal shopper who could anticipate and deliver what you need before you realize you even need it? Take a look at the Future of Artificial Intelligence for consumers in this edition of The Futurist Report series. 














Your digital business

Take control of your digital transformation by building an industrialized IT Platform that boosts profitability and relevance in the customer-centric digital era.








The touch felt around the world
Developing cutting-edge 5G network we have created the ability to allow the remote transfer of haptic, tactile, audio and visual technologies.
Learn more about our research projects with King's College





News

 










Recode Decode Live at Ericsson Silicon Valley


The popular weekly tech podcast Recode Decode was held live at the Ericsson Silicon Valley Experience Center on July 19, with straight-shooting tech journalist Kara Swisher interviewing Francis Frei - Uber’s new head of leadership and strategy.



































See the latest news







5G









Get set for a new generation of technology
The move to 5G networks opens up enormous business potential for operators and industries. Keep up to speed with our latest 5G technology developments, use cases and trials.






Cloud









Powering the digital industrialization
Cloud technologies bring agility and efficiency to IT environments. We believe digital industrialization strategies are key to turning your IT operations from a cost into an asset.






IoT









Creating billions of opportunities
We are experts in IoT connectivity and security. Launch IoT safer, faster and more efficiently with our platform and accelerate your business.






Security









Securing the evolving cyber environment
The emergence of 5G and IoT creates a need for new security solutions. Our security portfolio is tailored to protect ICT infrastructures and the data it handles and build a secure IoT business.









 





















Networks
IT
Media
Industries
Portfolio
In focus
Networked Society




About us
Contact us
News and events
Press center
Careers
Investors
Industry analysts
Policy makers
Channel Partners
Publications





+46 10 719 00 00

Find Ericsson offices


















Modern Slavery Statement
Cookies
Legal


© Ericsson AB 1994-2017




Modern Slavery Statement
Cookies
Legal
© Ericsson AB 1994-2017


















Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson, ERIXF:PKC summary - FT.com


















Subscribe


Sign In








Menu


Search




Financial Times




myFT










Search the FT


					Search
				






Search the FT


					Search
				

Close









MarketsMarkets DataEquities







Financial TimesCloseSearch theFTSearch

Equities


Telefonaktiebolaget LM EricssonERIXF:PKCSelect symbolSwedenERIC B:STOStockholmsborsen - cashERIC A:STOStockholmsborsen - cashERICBSEK:STOStockholmsborsen - cashERICAEUR:STOStockholmsborsen - cashERICASEK:STOStockholmsborsen - cashERICBEUR:STOStockholmsborsen - cashFinlandERIBR:HEXHelsinki Stock ExchangeGermanyERCB:BERBerlin Stock ExchangeERCB:DUSDusseldorf Stock ExchangeERICX,B:GERXETRA Level 1ERCB:MUNMunich Stock ExchangeERCB:STUStuttgart Stock ExchangeERCG:BERBerlin Stock ExchangeERICX,A:GERXETRA Level 1ERCA:BERBerlin Stock ExchangeERCA:DUSDusseldorf Stock ExchangeERCA:GERXETRA Level 1ERCA:DEUGerman CompositeERCA:MUNMunich Stock ExchangeERCA:STUStuttgart Stock ExchangeERICb:DEUGerman CompositeERICa:DEUGerman CompositeERCG:STUStuttgart Stock ExchangeERCB:FRAFrankfurt Stock ExchangeERCB:HAMHamburg Stock ExchangeERCG:FRAFrankfurt Stock ExchangeERCA:FRAFrankfurt Stock ExchangeERCA:HAMHamburg Stock ExchangeERCB:HANHanover Stock ExchangeArgentinaERIC:BUEBuenos Aires Stock ExchangeERIC.C:BUEBuenos Aires Stock ExchangeERIC.D:BUEBuenos Aires Stock ExchangeUnited StatesERIC:NSQNASDAQERIXF:PKCOTC Pink - Current InformationMexicoERICN:MEXMexico Stock ExchangeUnited Kingdom0O87:LSELondon Stock Exchange0O86:LSELondon Stock ExchangeSwitzerlandERICB:SWXSIX Swiss ExchangeERICB:SWXSIX Swiss ExchangeOXERI1:SWXSIX Swiss ExchangeERICB:SWXSIX Swiss ExchangeERIC B:BRNBerne Stock ExchangeFranceERICA:PARParis Stock ExchangeERICB:PARParis Stock ExchangeTelefonaktiebolaget LM EricssonActionsAdd to watchlistAdd to portfolioAdd an alertPrice (USD)6.29Today's Change0.00 / 0.00%Shares traded0.001 Year change-12.64%Beta1.1708Data delayed at least 15 minutes.More ▼ApplyCancelActionsAdd to Your WatchlistsNew watchlistNameCancelAddAdd to Your PortfolioNew portfolioNameCurrencySelect a currencyUK Pound (GBP)Argentinian Nuevo Peso (ARS)Australian Dollar (AUD)Bahraini Dinar (BHD)Brunei Dollar (BND)Brazilian Real (BRL)Canadian Dollar (CAD)Chilean Peso (CLP)Chinese Yuan Renminbi (CNY)Czech Koruna (CZK)Danish Krone (DKK)Egyptian Pound (EGP)Euro (EUR)Fiji Dollar (FJD)Hong Kong Dollar (HKD)Hungarian Forint (HUF)Israeli Shekel (ILS)Indian Rupee (INR)Indonesian Rupiah (IDR)Japanese Yen (JPY)Kuwaiti Dinar (KWD)Sri Lankan Rupee (LKR)Moroccan Dirham (MAD)Malaysian Ringgit (MYR)Mexican New Peso (MXN)New Zealand Dollar (NZD)Norwegian Krone (NOK)Omani Rial (OMR)Peruvian New Sol (PEN)Papua New Guinean Kina (PGK)Philippine Peso (PHP)Pakistani Rupee (PKR)Polish New Zloty (PLN)Russian Ruble (RUB)Saudi Riyal (SAR)Solomon Islands Dollar (SBD)Seychelles Rupee (SCR)Singapore Dollar (SGD)South African Rand (ZAR)Republic of Korean Won (KRW)Swedish Krona (SEK)Swiss Franc (CHF)Tongan Pa'anga (TOP)Taiwan Dollar (TWD)Thai Baht (THB)Turkish Lira (TRY)UAE Dirham (AED)Vietnamese Dong (VND)Vanuatu Vatu (VUV)Samoan Tala (WST)French Pacific Franc (XPF)US Dollar (USD)Ghana Cedi (GHS)Nigeria Naira (NGN)Ukraine Hryvnia (UAH)Kenya Shilling (KES)CancelContinueYour alertsDoneYou must be a registered user to save alerts.  Please sign in or register.







1D3D1W1M6M1Y3Y5YCompar ApplyCancelComparisonsMake up to three selections, then save.0 of 3 selected0 of 3 selectedSaveClearFT NewsFT NewsAnnouncementsAnnouncementsTech licensing system that keeps the giants in checkAug 01 2017Telecoms groups outperform growth expectationsJul 27 2017Ericsson warns on shrinking telecoms equipment marketJul 18 2017Ericsson chairman Leif Johansson to step down under pressure from activistJul 05 2017Activist Cevian takes aim at Ericsson board and WallenbergsMay 31 2017Ericsson: swing timeMay 31 2017Activist investor Cevian Capital amasses $1bn stake in EricssonMay 30 2017Nokia slows decline in networks businessApr 27 2017Nokia: still bufferingApr 27 2017Ericsson's woes deepen as hit by 11% fall in revenuesApr 25 2017Search FT.com for ERIXF:PKCMore ▼
        Ericsson to divest its power modules business to Flex
      Jun 21 2017
        Over one million new Mobile Internet users added per day
      Jun 13 2017
        Invitation to webinar: Ericsson Mobility Report June 2017
      Jun 09 2017
        Erik Ekudden named Group CTO for Ericsson
      May 30 2017
        Ericsson Annual Report on Form 20-F filed with the SEC
      Apr 26 2017
        Ericsson launches fully virtualized video processing platform
      Apr 19 2017
        Invitation to media and analyst calls for Ericsson Q1 2017 report
      Apr 11 2017Stabilisation NoticeMar 30 2017
        Francisco Partners to invest in Ericsson's iconectiv business
      Mar 07 2017
        Invitation to conference call on Ericsson's restated financials for 2015 and 2016
      Mar 06 2017More ▼Key statistics52-week rangeToday4.82Nov 04 20167.51Aug 23 2016Markit short selling activityLowMedHighOpen0.00High--Low--Bid--Offer--Previous close6.29Average volume986.60kShares outstanding3.33bnFree float3.30bnP/E (TTM)--Market cap171.70bn SEKEPS (TTM)-4.20  SEKAnnual div (ADY)0.1128  USDAnnual div yield (ADY)1.79%Div ex-dateMar 29 2017Div pay-dateApr 05 2017Data delayed at least 15 minutes.More ▼ 
About the companyTelefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson (Ericsson) provides infrastructure, services and software to the telecommunication industry and other sectors. The Company's segments include Networks, IT & Cloud and Media. The Networks segment consists of two business units: Network Products and Network Services. The overall focus is on evolving and managing access networks, including the development of hardware and software for radio access and transport networks. The IT & Cloud business includes two business units: IT & Cloud Products and IT & Cloud Services. The focus in IT & Cloud is to help telecom operators and selected enterprises through the digital transformations ahead. It develops and delivers software-based solutions for television and media and combines a product portfolio that spans the television value chain, with systems integration and managed services. The portfolio includes compression, content publishing through set-top box or pure over-the-top, content delivery and analytics.FT Lexicon{0}{0}{2}{0}{0}{2}For more information, visit the FT LexiconLexicon on this pageExplore our toolsAlertsData archivePortfolioWorld marketsEquities screenerFunds overview



 © Thomson Reuters Click for restrictions
All markets data located on FT.com is subject to the FT Terms & ConditionsAll content on FT.com is for your general information and use only and is not intended to address your particular requirements. In particular, the content does not constitute any form of advice, recommendation, representation, endorsement or arrangement by FT and is not intended to be relied upon by users in making (or refraining from making) any specific investment or other decisions.Any information that you receive via FT.com is at best delayed intraday data and not "real time". Share price information may be rounded up/down and therefore not entirely accurate. FT is not responsible for any use of content by you outside its scope as stated in the FT Terms & Conditions.
Markit Short Selling Activity © Markit. All rights reserved.Although Markit has made every effort to ensure this data is correct, nevertheless no guarantee is given to the accuracy or completeness. Any opinions or estimates expressed herein are those of Markit on the date of preparation and are subject to change without notice; however no such opinions or estimates constitute legal, investment or other advice. You must therefore seek independent legal, investment or other appropriate advice from a suitably qualified and/or authorised and regulated advisor prior to making any legal, investment or other decision. This is intended for information purposes only and is not intended as an offer or recommendation to buy, sell or otherwise deal in securities.







					Welcome to the FT.com Markets Data
				

					We’re constantly improving and would like to hear from you.
				


Provide Feedback

















 



Ericsson - Wikipedia






















 






Ericsson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from LM Ericsson)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the telecommunications company. For people with the surname "Ericsson", see Ericsson (surname). For other uses, see Ericsson (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article needs to be updated. Please update this article to reflect recent events or newly available information. (October 2016)







This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (November 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (November 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Telefonaktiebolaget L. M. Ericsson





Ericsson's headquarters in Kista, Stockholm.




Type

Publicly traded Aktiebolag


Traded as
Nasdaq Stockholm: ERIC-A
Nasdaq Stockholm: ERIC-B
NASDAQ: ERIC


Industry
Telecommunications equipment
Networking equipment


Founded
Stockholm, Sweden
(1876; 141 years ago (1876))


Founder
Lars Magnus Ericsson


Headquarters
Kista, Stockholm, Sweden



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

Leif Johansson
(Chairman)
Börje Ekholm
( President and CEO (Chief Executive Officer) )


Products
Mobile and fixed broadband networks, consultancy and managed services, TV and multimedia technology


Revenue
SEK 222.6 billion (2016)[1]



Operating income

SEK 6.3 billion (2016)[1]


Profit
SEK 1.9 billion (2016)[1]


Total assets
SEK 283.3 billion (2016)[1]


Total equity
SEK 140.5 billion (2016)[1]



Number of employees

111,464 (Dec 31, 2016)[2]


Subsidiaries
Ericsson Broadcast and Media Services


Website
www.ericsson.com


Ericsson (Telefonaktiebolaget L. M. Ericsson) is a multinational networking and telecommunications equipment and services company headquartered in Stockholm, Sweden. The company offers services, software and infrastructure in information and communications technology (ICT) for telecommunications operators, traditional telecommunications and Internet Protocol (IP) networking equipment, mobile and fixed broadband, operations and business support services, cable television, IPTV, video systems, and an extensive services operation. Ericsson had 35% market share in the 2G/3G/4G mobile network infrastructure market in 2012.[3]
The company was founded in 1876 by Lars Magnus Ericsson;[4] as of 2016[update] it is headquartered in Stockholm, Sweden. The company employs around 109,000 people and operates in around 180 countries.[5][6] Ericsson holds over 39,000 granted patents as of May 2015, including many in wireless communications.[7]. On June 20, 2017, Bloomberg disclosed that Ericsson hired Morgan Stanley to explore the sale of its media businesses. [8]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Foundation
1.2 International expansion
1.3 Automatic equipment
1.4 Shareholding changes
1.5 Wallenberg era begins
1.6 Market development
1.7 Further development
1.8 1995–2003: emergence of the Internet
1.9 2003–2016: rebuilding and growing
1.10 Acquisitions, expansion, consolidation and cooperation


2 Corporate governance
3 Research and development
4 Products and services

4.1 Business Area Networks (Earlier Business Unit Networks)
4.2 Business Unit Global Services
4.3 Business Unit Support Solutions

4.3.1 Systems integration
4.3.2 Network services
4.3.3 Broadcast services


4.4 Business Unit Modems


5 Divested businesses

5.1 Mobile (cell) telephones
5.2 Telephones
5.3 Ericsson Mobile Platforms
5.4 Ericsson Enterprise


6 .mobi and mobile Internet
7 See also
8 References
9 Further reading
10 External links



History[edit]
Foundation[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (January 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Lars Magnus Ericsson


Lars Magnus Ericsson began his association with telephones in his youth as an instrument maker. He worked for a firm that made telegraph equipment for the Swedish government agency Telegrafverket. In 1876, at the age of 30, he started a telegraph repair shop with help from his friend Carl Johan Andersson in central Stockholm and repaired foreign-made telephones. In 1878 Ericsson began making and selling his own telephone equipment. His telephones were not technically innovative. In 1878 he made an agreement to supply telephones and switchboards to Sweden's first telecommunications operating company, Stockholms Allmänna Telefonaktiebolag.[4]
Also in 1878, local telephone importer Numa Peterson hired Ericsson to adjust some telephones from the Bell Telephone Company. He bought a number of Siemens telephones and analyzed the technology; Ericsson had a scholarship at Siemens a few years earlier. He was familiar with Bell and Siemens Halske telephones through his firm's repair work for Telegrafverket and Swedish Railways. He improved these designs to produce a higher-quality instrument to be used by new telephone companies such as Rikstelefon to provide cheaper service than the Bell Group. Ericsson had no patent or royalty problems because Bell had not patented their inventions in Scandinavia. His training as an instrument maker was reflected in the standard of finish and the ornate design of Ericsson telephones of this period. At the end of the year he started to manufacture telephones much like those of Siemens; the first product was finished in 1879.
Ericsson became a major supplier of telephone equipment to Scandinavia. Its factory could not keep up with demand; joinery and metal-plating were contracted out. Much of its raw materials were imported; in the following decades Ericsson bought into a number of firms to ensure supplies of brass, wire, ebonite, and magnet steel. Much of the walnut wood used for cabinets was imported from the United States.
Stockholm's telephone network expanded that year and the company reformed into a telephone manufacturer. When Bell bought the biggest telephone network in Stockholm, it only allowed its own telephones to be used with it. Ericsson's equipment was sold mainly to free telephone associations in the Swedish countryside and in other Nordic countries.
The prices of Bell equipment and services led Henrik Tore Cedergren to form an independent telephone company called Stockholms Allmänna Telefonaktiebolag in 1883. As Bell would not deliver equipment to competitors, he formed a pact with Ericsson to supply the equipment for his new telephone network. In 1918 the companies were merged into Allmänna Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson.
In 1884, a multiple-switchboard manual telephone exchange was mostly copied from a design by C. E. Scribner at Western Electric. This was legal because the device was not patented in Sweden, although in the United States it had held patent 529421 since 1879. A single switchboard could handle up to 10,000 lines. The following year, LM Ericsson and Cedergren toured the United States, visiting several telephone exchange stations to gather "inspiration".[citation needed] They found U.S. switchboard designs were more advanced but Ericsson telephones were equal to others.
In 1884, a technician named Anton Avén at Stockholms Allmänna Telefonaktiebolag combined the earpiece and the mouthpiece of a standard telephone into a handset. It was used by operators in the exchanges where operators needed to have one hand free when talking to customers. Ericsson picked up this invention and incorporated it into Ericsson products, beginning with a telephone named The Dachshund.
International expansion[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (January 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






An early, wooden, Ericsson telephone, made by the Ericsson Telephone Co. Ltd., of Nottingham, England, it is now in the collection of Thinktank, Birmingham Science Museum.


As production grew in the late 1890s, and the Swedish market seemed to be reaching saturation, Ericsson expanded into foreign markets through a number of agents. The UK and Russia were early markets, where factories were later established improve the chances of gaining local contracts and to augment the output of the Swedish factory. In the UK, the National Telephone Company was a major customer; by 1897 the UK sold 28% of its output there. The Nordic countries were also Ericsson customers; they were encouraged by the growth of telephone services in Sweden.[4]
Other countries and colonies were exposed to Ericsson products through the influence of their parent countries. These included Australia and New Zealand, which by the late 1890s were Ericsson's largest non-European markets. Mass production techniques now firmly established; telephones were losing some of their ornate finish and decoration.
Despite their successes elsewhere, Ericsson did not make significant sales into the United States. The Bell Group, Kellogg and Automatic Electric dominated the market. Ericsson eventually sold its U.S. assets. Sales in Mexico led to inroads into South American countries. South Africa and China were also generating significant sales. With his company now multinational, Lars Ericsson stepped down from the company in 1901.
In December 1st, Ericsson announced laying off 160 people in the Nigerian offices and moving the jobs to India.[9]
Automatic equipment[edit]




LM Ericsson's former headquarters at Telefonplan in Stockholm, see LM Ericsson building


Ericsson ignored the growth of automatic telephony in the United States and concentrated on manual exchange designs. Their first dial telephone was produced in 1921, although sales of the early automatic switching systems were slow until the equipment had proven itself on the world's markets. Telephones of this period had a simpler design and finish, and many of the early automatic desk telephones in Ericsson's catalogues were magneto styles with a dial on the front and appropriate changes to the electronics. Elaborate decals decorated the cases.[4] World War I, the subsequent Great Depression, and the loss of its Russian assets after the Revolution slowed the company's development and restricted its sales to countries such as Australia.[citation needed]
Shareholding changes[edit]
The acquisition of other telecommunications companies put pressure on Ericsson's finances; in 1925, Karl Fredric Wincrantz took control of the company by acquiring most of the shares. Wincrantz was partly funded by Ivar Kreuger, an international financier. The company was renamed Telefon AB LM Ericsson. Kreuger started showing interest in the company, being a major owner of Wincrantz holding companies.[4]
In 1928, Ericsson began issuing "A" and "B" shares; an "A" share had 1000 votes against a "B" share. Wincrantz controlled the company by having only a few "A" shares, not a majority of the shares. The company raised more money by issuing a lot of "B" shares, while maintaining the status quo of power distribution.[citation needed] In 1930, a second issue of "B"-shares took place, and Kreuger gained majority control of the company with a mixture of "A" and "B" shares he bought with money lent by LM Ericsson, with security given in German state bonds. He then took a loan for his own company Kreuger & Toll from ITT Corporation (administered by Sosthenes Behn), giving parts of LM Ericsson as security, and used its assets and name in a series of international financial dealings.[citation needed]
Ericsson was now regarded by ITT as a takeover target as its main international competitor. In 1931, ITT acquired enough shares from Kreuger to have a majority interest in Ericsson. This news was not made public for some time because of a government-imposed limit on foreign shareholdings in Swedish companies, so the shares were still listed in Kreuger's name.[citation needed] Kreuger in return gained shares in ITT; he stood to make a profit of $11 million[clarification needed] on the deal.[citation needed] When ITT's Behn wanted to cancel this deal in 1932, he discovered there was no money left in the company, just a large claim on the same Kreuger & Toll that Kreuger had himself lent money to. Kreuger had effectively bought LM Ericsson with its own money.[citation needed]
Kreuger had been using the company as security for loans; despite his profits he unable to repay them. Ericsson found they had invested in some doubtful share deals, whose losses were deemed significant. ITT examined the deal and found it had been misled about Ericsson's value.[citation needed] ITT asked Kreuger to go to New York City for a conference, but he did not attend. As word of Kreuger's financial position spread, the banking institutions pressured him to provide security for his loans.[citation needed] ITT canceled the deal to buy Ericsson shares. Kreuger could not repay the $11 million, and committed suicide in Paris in 1932.[citation needed] ITT owned one third of Ericsson, but was forbidden to exercise this ownership because of a paragraph in the company's articles of association stating that no foreign investor was allowed to control more than 20% of the votes.[citation needed]
Wallenberg era begins[edit]
Ericsson was saved from bankruptcy and closure with the help of banks including Stockholms Enskilda Bank (now Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken) and other Swedish investment banks controlled by the Wallenberg family, and some Swedish government backing. Marcus Wallenberg Jr. negotiated a deal with several Swedish banks to rebuild Ericsson financially. The banks gradually increased their possession of LM Ericsson "A" shares, while ITT was still the largest shareholder. In 1960, the Wallenberg family arranged with ITT to buy its shares in Ericsson, and has since controlled the company.[4]
Market development[edit]




The Ericsson DBH1001 (1931) was the first combined telephone set with a housing and handset made from Bakelite. The design is attributed to Jean Heiberg.






The Ericsson DBH15 telephone, a successor of the DBH 1001 and redesigned in 1947 by Gerard Kiljan


In the 1920s and 1930s, the world telephone markets were being organized and stabilized by many governments. The fragmented town-by-town systems serviced by small, private companies that had evolved were integrated and offered for lease to a single company. Ericsson obtained some leases, which represented further sales of equipment to the growing networks. Ericsson got almost one third of its sales under the control of its telephone operating companies.[4]
Negotiations between the major telephone companies aimed at dividing up the world between them.[citation needed] The size of ITT made it hard to compete with. Ericsson reduced its involvement in telephone operating companies and went back to manufacturing telephones and switchgear. The Beeston factory in the UK had been a joint venture between Ericsson and the National Telephone Company.[citation needed] The factory built automatic switching equipment for the GPO under license from Strowger, and exported products to former UK colonies.[citation needed] The UK government divided its equipment contracts between competing manufacturers, but Ericsson's presence and manufacturing facilities in the UK allowed it to get most of the contracts.[citation needed]
Sales drives resumed after the Great Depression, but the company never achieved the market penetration that it had at the turn of the century. It still produced a range of telephones and switching equipment; the latter was becoming a more important part of its range. The distinctive Ericsson styles became subdued by the increasing use of bakelite telephones starting in the 1930s.[citation needed]
Further development[edit]
Ericsson introduced the world's first fully automatic mobile telephone system, MTA, in 1956.[10] It released one of the world's first hands-free speaker telephones in the 1960s. In 1954, it released the Ericofon. Ericsson crossbar switching equipment was used in telephone administrations in many countries.[citation needed] In 1983 the company introduced the ERIPAX suite of network products and services.
1995–2003: emergence of the Internet[edit]
In the 1990s, during the emergence of the Internet, Ericsson was regarded as slow to realize its potential and falling behind in the area of IP technology.[11] But the company had established an Internet project in 1995 called Infocom Systems to exploit opportunities leading from fixed-line telecom and IT. CEO Lars Ramqvist wrote in the 1996 annual report that in all three of its business areas – Mobile Telephones and Terminals, Mobile Systems, and Infocom Systems – "we will expand our operations as they relate to customer service and Internet Protocol (IP) access (Internet and intranet access)".[12]
The growth of GSM, which became a de facto world standard, combined with Ericsson’s other mobile standards, such as D-AMPS and PDC, meant that by the start of 1997, Ericsson had an estimated 40% share of the world’s mobile market, with around 54 million subscribers. There were also around 188 million AXE lines in place or on order in 117 countries.[12] Telecom and chip companies worked in the 1990s to provide Internet access over mobile telephones. Early versions such as Wireless Application Protocol (WAP) used packet data over the existing GSM network, in a form known as GPRS (General Packet Radio Service), but these services, known as 2.5G, were fairly rudimentary and did not achieve much mass-market success.[citation needed]
The International Telecommunication Union (ITU) had prepared the specifications for a 3G mobile service that included several technologies. Ericsson pushed hard for the WCDMA (wideband CDMA) form based on the GSM standard, and began testing it in 1996. Japanese operator NTT DoCoMo signed deals to partner with Ericsson and Nokia, who came together in 1997 to support WCDMA over rival standards. DoCoMo was the first operator with a live 3G network, using its own version of WCDMA called FOMA. Ericsson was a significant developer of the WCDMA version of GSM, while US-based chip developer Qualcomm promoted the alternative system CDMA2000, building on the popularity of CDMA in the US market. This resulted in a patent infringement lawsuit that was resolved in March 1999[13] when the two companies agreed to pay each other royalties for the use of their respective technologies and Ericsson purchased Qualcomm’s wireless infrastructure business and some R&D resources.[14]
Once the Qualcomm conflict was settled, Ericsson continued to be involved in mobile Internet. It announced a partnership with Microsoft to combine its web browser and server software with Ericsson’s mobile Internet technologies.[15] The subsequent joint venture was dissolved in 2001 in the aftermath of the Internet and telecom crashes.[citation needed]
Ericsson got caught up in the Dot-com bubble of the late 1990s. The company’s market value increased; its share price peaked at SEK 825 in March 2000, from a low of SEK 20 at the start of the 1990s.[16] Lars Ramqvist resigned as CEO in January 1998, and later became chairperson of the board. Sven-Christer Nilsson took over as CEO in early 1998, and led the company in a clearer IP direction. Under his leadership, the company's acquisitions including a share in US router company Juniper.[17]
Ericsson had become a leading player in networks and the production of mobile telephones, sharing top place with Nokia and Motorola during 1997.[18] Services were becoming increasingly important; Ericsson had offered network rollout services for many years, and had operated networks, but at the end of the 1990s the services operations were amalgamated into a services unit.[citation needed]
In June 1999, Kurt Hellström, the head of Ericsson’s mobile division, replaced Nilsson as CEO. Worldwide hype around the potential of the internet – and for Ericsson in particular the mobile internet – had inflated industry expectations.[citation needed] Operators in many Westernized countries used much of their capital bidding for 3G licenses, and could not afford the new networks required to use the spectrum they had acquired.[citation needed] The order intake that Ericsson and other telecom vendors had expected, and invested in preparing for, was disappointing, causing job losses and consolidations across the industry.[citation needed]
Ericsson issued a profit warning in March 2001. Over the coming year, sales to operators halved.[19] Mobile telephones became a burden; the company's telephones unit made a loss of SEK 24 million in 2000. A fire in a Philips chip factory in New Mexico in March 2000 caused severe disruption to Ericsson’s phone production,[20] dealing a coup de grâce to Ericsson’s mobile phone hopes. Mobile phones would be spun off into a joint venture with Sony, Sony Ericsson Mobile Communications, in October 2001.[21] Ericsson launched several rounds of restructuring, refinancing and job-cutting; during 2001, staff numbers fell from 107,000 to 85,000.[22] A further 20,000 went the next year,[23] and 11,000 more in 2003.[24] A new rights issue raised SEK 30 billion to keep the company afloat. The company had survived as mobile Internet started growing. With record profits, it was in better shape than many of its competitors.[25]
2003–2016: rebuilding and growing[edit]
The emergence of full mobile Internet began a period of growth for the global telecom industry, including Ericsson. After the launch of 3G services during 2003,[26][27] people started to access the Internet using their telephones.
Ericsson’s position as a supplier of GSM equipment to many major operators, and its pioneering role in the emerging 3G standards and associated technology, placed it at the forefront of many of the changes to come. The cutbacks that followed 10 consecutive quarters of losses meant the company could return to profit in Q3 2003, and begin to grow again. After announcing in 2003 that it had returned to growth, new CEO Carl-Henric Svanberg said the company was to concentrate on operational excellence, a wide-ranging push for efficiency and better return on investment that dominated Ericsson’s corporate culture for several years.[citation needed]
During the cutbacks, Ericsson had reduced its CDMA organization. This standard, used largely in North America, Japan and mainland Asia, was a rival to GSM, and Ericsson had a global market share of 25%, but the overall volumes were too low so Ericsson wound down its CDMA commitment, ending it completely by 2006.[citation needed] Ericsson started a series of acquisitions to strengthen its position in key technologies and market segments.[citation needed] The first of these was Marconi, a company dating back to the dawn of radio whose assets included a strong portfolio in transmission, fiber optic and fixed network services.[citation needed] Further acquisitions included Redback Networks (carrier edge-routers), Entrisphere (fiber) and LHS Telekommunikation (customer care services) in 2007, and Tandberg Television in 2008.[citation needed] Ericsson sold its enterprise PBX division to Aastra Technologies the same year.[28][29] Ericsson re-entered the CDMA market after acquiring North American vendor Nortel’s CDMA operations and assets in 2009.[citation needed] The acquisitions followed Ericsson’s general strategy of expanding into next-generation network technologies and multimedia, a combined offering that became more important as video became the dominant form of data traffic on mobile broadband networks.[citation needed]40% of the world's mobile traffic is carried over Ericsson networks.[30] Ericsson created a division to develop its multimedia business in early 2007.[citation needed]
Ericsson was working on ways to improve WCDMA as operators were buying and rolling it out; it was the first generation of 3G access. New advances included IMS (IP Multimedia Subsystem) and the next evolution of WCDMA, called High-Speed Packet Access (HSPA). It was initially deployed in the download version called HSDPA; the technology spread from the first test calls in the US in late 2005[31] to 59 commercial networks in September 2006.[32] HSPA would provide the world’s first mobile broadband.
In July 2016, Hans Vestberg stepped down as Ericsson's CEO, after a half-dozen years heading the company. Jan Frykhammar, who has been working for the company since 1991 will be stepping in as interim CEO as Ericsson searches for a full-time replacement.[33]
On October 26th, Ericsson announced its new CEO. Börje Ekholm has started on January 16, 2017 and interim CEO Jan Frykhammar steps down on the following day. [34]
Acquisitions, expansion, consolidation and cooperation[edit]
Around 2000, companies and governments began to push for standards for mobile Internet. In May 2000, the European Commission created the Wireless Strategic Initiative,[35] a consortium of four telecommunications suppliers in Europe – Ericsson, Nokia, Alcatel (France), and Siemens AG (Germany) – to develop and test new prototypes for advanced wireless communications systems. Later that year, the consortium partners invited other companies to join them in a Wireless World Research Forum in 2001.[citation needed] In December 1999, Microsoft and Ericsson announced a strategic partnership to combine the former's web browser and server software with the latter's mobile-internet technologies.[36] In 2000, the Dot-com bubble burst with marked economic implications for Sweden. Ericsson, the world's largest producer of mobile telecommunications equipment, shed thousands of jobs, as did the country's Internet consulting firms and dot-com start-ups. In the same year, Intel, the world's largest semiconductor chip manufacturer, signed a $1.5 billion deal to supply flash memory to Ericsson over the next three years.[37]
The short-lived joint venture called Ericsson Microsoft Mobile Venture AB, owned 70/30 percent by Ericsson and Microsoft, respectively, ended in October 2001 when Ericsson announced it would absorb the former joint venture and adopt a licensing agreement with Microsoft instead.[38] The same month, Ericsson announced the launch of Sony Ericsson, a joint venture mobile telephone business, together with Sony Corporation.[39] Sony Ericsson remained in operation until February 2012, when Sony bought out Ericsson's share; Ericsson said it wanted to focus on the global wireless market as a whole.[40][41]
Lower stock prices and job losses affected many telecommunications companies in 2001. The major equipment manufacturers – Motorola (U.S.), Lucent Technologies (U.S.), Cisco Systems (U.S.), Marconi (UK), Siemens AG (Germany), Nokia (Finland), as well as Ericsson – all announced job cuts in their home countries and in subsidiaries around the world. Ericsson's workforce worldwide fell during 2001 from 107,000 to 85,000.[42]
In September 2001, Ericsson purchased the remaining shares in EHPT from Hewlett Packard.[43] Founded in 1993, Ericsson Hewlett Packard Telecom (EHPT) was a Joint Venture made up of 60% Ericsson interests and 40% Hewlett-Packard interests.[citation needed]
In 2002, ICT investor losses topped $2 trillion and share prices fell by 95% until August that year. More than half a million people lost their jobs in the global telecom industry over the two years.[44] The collapse of U.S. carrier WorldCom, with more than $107 billion in assets, was the biggest in U.S. history.[45] The sector's problems caused bankruptcies and job losses, and led to changes in the leadership of a number of major companies. Ericsson made 20,000 more staff redundant and raised about $3 billion from its shareholders.[46] In June 2002, Infineon Technologies AG (then the sixth-largest semiconductor supplier and a subsidiary of Siemens AG) bought Ericsson’s microelectronics unit for $400 million.[47]
Co-operation with Hewlett-Packard did not end with EHPT; in 2003 Ericsson outsourced its IT to HP, which included Managed Services, Help Desk Support, Data Center Operations, and HP Utility Data Center. The contract was extended in 2008.[48] There have also been a number of joint Ericsson/HP Telecoms outsourcing deals with telecoms operators including H3G and Vodafone.[citation needed] In October 2005, Ericsson acquired the bulk of the troubled UK telecommunications manufacturer Marconi Company, including its brand name that dates back to the creation of the original Marconi Company by the "father of radio" Guglielmo Marconi.[49] In September 2006, Ericsson sold the greater part of its defense business Ericsson Microwave Systems, which mainly produced sensor and radar systems, to Saab AB, which renamed the company to Saab Microwave Systems.[50] The sale meant Saab Ericsson Space, previously a joint venture, was now fully owned by Saab. Not included in the sale to Saab was the National Security & Public Safety division, which was transferred to Ericsson with the sale.[citation needed]
In 2007, Ericsson acquired carrier edge-router maker Redback Networks, and then Entrisphere, a US-based company providing fiber-access technology.[51] In September 2007, Ericsson acquired an 84% interest in German customer-care and billing software firm LHS, a stake later raised to 100%.[52] In 2008, Ericsson sold its enterprise PBX division[53] to Aastra Technologies, and acquired Tandberg Television, the television technology division[54] of Norwegian company Tandberg.
In 2009, Ericsson bought the CDMA2000 and LTE business of Nortel’s carrier networks division for USD 1.18 billion;[55] Bizitek, a Turkish business support systems integrator; the Estonian manufacturing operations of electronic manufacturing company Elcoteq; and completed its acquisition of LHS.[56] Acquisitions in 2010 included assets from the Strategy and Technology Group of inCode, a North American business and consulting-services company;[57] Nortel’s majority shareholding (50% plus one share) in LG-Nortel, a joint venture between LG Electronics and Nortel Networks providing sales, R&D and industrial capacity in South Korea, now known as Ericsson-LG; further Nortel carrier-division assets, relating from Nortel’s GSM business in the United States and Canada; Optimi Corporation, a U.S.–Spanish telecommunications vendor specializing in network optimization and management;[58] and Pride, a consulting and systems-integration company operating in Italy.
In 2011, Ericsson acquired manufacturing and research facilities, and staff from the Guangdong Nortel Telecommunication Equipment Company (GDNT)[59] as well as Nortel’s Multiservice Switch business.[60] It also formed a strategic alliance with Akamai Technologies to develop and market mobile cloud acceleration services.[citation needed] Ericsson acquired U.S. company Telcordia Technologies in January 2012,[61] an operations and business support systems (OSS/BSS) company.[62] In March, Ericsson announced it was buying the broadcast-services division of Technicolor, a media broadcast technology company.[citation needed] In April 2012 Ericsson completed the acquisition of BelAir Networks a strong Wi-Fi network technology company.[citation needed]
On 3 May 2013, Ericsson announced it would divest its power cable operations to Danish company NKT Holding.[63] On 1 July 2013, Ericsson announced it would acquire the media management company Red Bee Media, subject to regulatory approval.[64] The acquisition was completed on 9 May 2014.[65] In September 2013, Ericsson completed its acquisition of Microsoft's Mediaroom business and televisions services, originally announced in April the same year. The acquisition makes Ericsson the largest provider of IPTV and multi-screen services in the world, by market share; it was renamed Ericsson Mediaroom.[66] In September 2014, Ericsson acquired majority stake in Apcera for cloud policy compliance.[67]
Corporate governance[edit]
As of 2016[update], members of the board of directors of LM Ericsson were: Leif Johansson, Jacob Wallenberg, Kristin S. Rinne, Helena Stjernholm, Sukhinder Singh Cassidy, Börje Ekholm, Ulf J. Johansson, Mikael Lännqvist, Zlatko Hadzic, Kjell-Åke Soting, Nora Denzel, Kristin Skogen Lund, Pehr Claesson, Karin Åberg and Roger Svensson.[68]
Research and development[edit]
Ericsson has structured its R&D in three levels depending on when products or technologies will be introduced to customers and users.[69] Its research and development organization is part of Group Function Technology and focuses on wireless access networks; radio access technologies; broadband technologies; packet technologies; multimedia technologies; services and software; EMF safety and sustainability; security and global services.[70] These areas cover different parts of the entire network architecture.
Group Function Technology holds research co-operations with several major universities and research institutes including: Lund University in Sweden, Eötvös Loránd University in Hungary and Beijing Institute of Technology in China.[71] Ericsson also holds research co-operations within several European research programs such as GigaWam and OASE.[72] Ericsson holds 33,000 granted patents, and is the number-one holder of GSM/GPRS/EDGE, WCDMA/HSPA, and LTE essential patents.[73]
Ericsson hosts a developer program called Ericsson Developer Connection[74] designed to encourage development of applications and services.[75] Ericsson also has an open innovation initiative for beta applications and beta API's & tools called Ericsson Labs.[citation needed] The company hosts several internal innovation competitions among its employees.[citation needed]
Products and services[edit]
Ericsson’s business includes technology research, development, network and software development, and running and evolving operations.[70][76] and software[77][78] Ericsson offers end-to-end services for all major mobile communication standards,[79] and has four main business units.[80]
Business Area Networks (Earlier Business Unit Networks)[edit]
Business Unit Networks has been headed by Johan Wibergh since 2008. It develops network infrastructure for communication needs over mobile and fixed connections.[80] As of 1 July 2014, BNET has been divided into Business Unit Radio and Business Unit Cloud & IP.[81] Its products include radio base stations, radio network controllers, mobile switching centers and service application nodes. Operators use Ericsson products to migrate from 2G to 3G and, most recently, to 4G networks.[82]
The company's network division has been described as a driver in the development of 2G, 3G, 4G/LTE technology, future 5G and the evolution towards all-IP,[83] and it develops and deploys advanced LTE systems,[84] but it is still developing the older GSM,[85][86] WCDMA, and CDMA technologies.[87] The company's networks portfolio also includes core networks, microwave transport, Internet Protocol (IP) networks, fixed-access services for copper and fiber, and mobile broadband modules, several levels of fixed broadband access,[88][89] radio access networks from small pico cells to high-capacity macro cells, controllers for radio base stations, and core network nodes that interconnect radio access networks with other parts of the network.[citation needed] Ericsson Power Modules supplies direct current (DC)/DC converters and DC/DC regulators, mainly to the communications industry, for advanced applications, such as multiplexors, switches, routers and radio base stations.[90] Manufacturing is in China.
Business Unit Global Services[edit]
Since 2010, Magnus Mandersson has been Head of Business Unit Global Services.[91] It provides telecoms-related managed services, including taking responsibility for running an operator’s network and the related business support systems.[citation needed] The unit is active in 180 countries; it supplies managed services,[92] systems integration, consulting, network rollout, design and optimization, broadcast services, learning services and support.[93][94][95][96] The company also works with television and media, public safety, and utilities. Ericsson claims to manage networks that serve more than 1 billion subscribers worldwide,[97] and to support customer networks that serve more than 2.5 billion subscribers.
Business Unit Support Solutions[edit]
Per Borgklint has headed Business Unit Support Solutions since 2011.[91] Initially established in 2007, as Business Unit Multimedia, Ericsson announced a new strategy for its multimedia business in February 2012.[98] Its Business Unit Support Solutions now develops software for operations and business support systems (OSS and BSS), real-time, multi-screen and on-demand television and media, and for the emerging m-commerce eco-system. Ericsson claims a leading position in charging and billing, serving 1.6 billion people.[99]

OSS and BSS expanded after the integration of Telcordia,[100] and it focuses on Customer experience management including fulfilment, assurance, network optimization and real-time charging.
TV and media offers products that enable operators and content owners to sell multi-screen TV services.[101]
M-Commerce sells mobile e-commerce products,[102] for mobile operators and financial institutions offer mobile wallet services to consumers.[103] Ericsson has announced m-commerce deals with Western Union[104] and African wireless carrier MTN.[105]

Systems integration[edit]
Ericsson's systems integration offering currently[when?] consists of seven service offerings:[106]

Operations Support Systems
Business Support Systems
IP Networks and Architecture
TV, Applications and Service Delivery Platforms
Solution and Life-Cycle Management
Data Migration
Multi-Vendor Verification

Network services[edit]
Ericsson's network rollout services employ in-house capabilities, subcontractors and central resources to make changes to live networks.[107] Services such as technology deployment, network transformation, and network optimization are also provided.[93]
Broadcast services[edit]
Ericsson's Broadcast Services deal with the playout of live and pre-recorded, commercial and public service television programmes, including presentation (continuity announcements), trailers, and ancillary access services such as closed-caption subtitles, audio description and in-vision sign language interpreters.[108] Its media management services consist of Managed Media Preparation and Managed Media Internet Delivery.[109]
Business Unit Modems[edit]
As of 7 May 2014, Robert Puskaric assumed the role as Vice President and Head of Business Unit Modems, succeeding Mats Norin who had the position since August 2013.[110] This unit designs and sells LTE multimode thin modems, including 2G, 3G and 4G interoperability.[111] This activity was transferred to Ericsson from ST-Ericsson when the new Modems organization was put in place.[112] The unit has developed products including the Ericsson M7000 series multimode modems which support LTE (FDD /TDD), HSPA+, HSPA, TD-SCDMA and EDGE. In September 2014, Ericsson announced it would stop developing modems, shutting a loss-making unit it took on after joint venture partner STMicroelectronics pulled out.[113]
Divested businesses[edit]
Sony Ericsson Mobile Communications AB (Sony Ericsson) was a joint venture with Sony that merged the previous mobile telephone operations of both companies. It manufactured mobile telephones, accessories and personal computer (PC) cards. Sony Ericsson was responsible for product design and development, marketing, sales, distribution and customer services. On 16 February 2012, Sony announced it had completed the full acquisition of Sony Ericsson.[114]
Further information: List of Sony Ericsson products
Mobile (cell) telephones[edit]
As a joint venture with Sony, Ericsson’s mobile telephone production was moved into the company Sony Ericsson in 2001. The following is a list of mobile phones marketed under the brand name Ericsson.




GF 768



Ericsson GS88 – Cancelled mobile telephone where Ericsson invented the "Smartphone" name for
Ericsson GA628 – Known for its Z80 CPU
Ericsson SH888 – First mobile telephone to have wireless modem capabilities
Ericsson A1018 – Dualband cellphone, notably easy to hack
Ericsson A2618 & Ericsson A2628 – Dualband cellphones. Use graphical LCD display based on PCF8548 I²C controller.[115]
Ericsson PF768
Ericsson GF768
Ericsson GH388
Ericsson T10 – Colourful Cellphone
Ericsson T18 – Business model of the T10, with active flip
Ericsson T28 – Very slim telephone. Uses lithium polymer batteries. Ericsson T28 FAQ use graphical LCD display based on PCF8558 I²C controller.
Ericsson T20s
Ericsson T29s – Similar to the T28s, but with WAP support
Ericsson T29m – pre-alpha prototype for the T39m
Ericsson T36m – Prototype for the T39m. Announced in yellow and blue. Never hit the market due to release T39m
Ericsson T39 – Similar to the T28, but with a GPRS modem, Bluetooth and triband capabilities
Ericsson T65
Ericsson T66
Ericsson T68m – The first Ericsson handset to have a color display, later branded as Sony Ericsson T68i
Ericsson R250s Pro – Fully dust and water resistant telephone
Ericsson R310s
Ericsson R320s
Ericsson R320s Titan – Limited Edition with titanium front
Ericsson R320s GPRS – Prototype for testing GPRS networks
Ericsson R360m – Pre-alpha prototype for the R520m
Ericsson R380 – First cellphone to use the Symbian OS
Ericsson R520m – Similar to the T39, but in a candy bar form factor[clarification needed] and with added features such as a built-in speakerphone and an optical proximity sensor
Ericsson R520m UMTS – Prototype to test UMTS networks
Ericsson R520m SyncML – Prototype to test the SyncML implementation
Ericsson R580m – Announced in several press releases. Supposed to be a successor of the R380s without external antenna and with color display
Ericsson R600

Telephones[edit]

Ericsson Dialog
Ericofon

Ericsson Mobile Platforms[edit]
Ericsson Mobile Platforms was a supplier of technology platforms for GSM/EDGE and WCDMA/HSPA platforms used in devices, such as mobile handsets and PC cards.[citation needed] Through Ericsson Mobile Platforms, Ericsson licensed open-standard, end-to-end interoperability-tested GSM/EDGE and WCDMA technology platforms.[citation needed] The product offering included reference designs, platform software, application-specific integrated circuit (ASIC) designs and development boards, development and test tools, training, support and documentation. Ericsson Mobile Platforms had operations at nine global locations, with main operations in Sweden.[citation needed]
The company existed for eight years; on 12 February 2009, Ericsson announced it would be merged with the mobile platform company of STMicroelectronics, ST-NXP Wireless, to create a 50/50 joint venture owned by Ericsson and STMicroelectronics.[116] This joint venture was divested in 2013 and remaining activities can be found in Ericsson Modems and STMicroelectronics. Ericsson Mobile Platform ceased being a legal entity early 2009.[citation needed]
Ericsson Enterprise[edit]
Starting in 1983 Ericsson Enterprise provided communications systems and services for businesses, public entities and educational institutions. It produced products for voice over Internet protocol (VoIP)-based private branch exchanges (PBX), wireless local area networks (WLAN), and mobile intranets. Ericsson Enterprise operated mainly from Sweden but also operated through regional units and other partners/distributors. In 2008 it was sold to Aastra.[117][118]
.mobi and mobile Internet[edit]
Ericsson was an official backer in the launch of the .mobi top level domain created specifically for the mobile internet.[119] Since the launch of .mobi in September 2006, Ericsson has launched SonyEricsson.mobi, the mobile portal of Sony Ericsson.
See also[edit]


Companies portal



Investor AB
Sony Ericsson (now Sony Mobile Communications)
List of Sony Ericsson products
Cedergren
Ericsson Nikola Tesla
Erlang (programming language)
Tandberg Television

References[edit]


^ a b c d e "Fourth quarter and full-year report 2016" (PDF). ericsson.com. Retrieved 2017-01-30. 
^ "Company facts". Retrieved 30 January 2017. 
^ Gartner, 6 August 2013: Magic Quadrant for LTE Network Infrastructure
^ a b c d e f g "Start". Ericsson History. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Company facts". Ericsson.com. Ericsson AB. Retrieved 5 November 2016. 
^ "About us". Ericsson.com. Ericsson AB. Retrieved 5 November 2016. 
^ "The Leader in Mobile Communication Patents". Ericsson.com. Ericsson AB. Retrieved 5 November 2016. 
^ https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2017-06-20/ericsson-said-to-hire-banks-to-explore-sale-of-media-businesses
^ "Ericsson sacks 160 Nigerian workers, takes jobs to India". 
^ "Ericsson Celebrates 50 Years of Mobile Telephony". Cellular-news.com. 17 October 2006. Retrieved 9 October 2011. 
^ "The Internet and the New World". History of Ericsson. 
^ a b "Annual Report 1996" (PDF). Ericsson. 
^ Gohring, Nancy (29 March 1999). "Ericsson/Qualcomm bitter feud ends". Connected Planet. Archived from the original on 9 January 2014. 
^ "Short Take: Qualcomm, Ericsson finalize CDMA agreement". CNET. [dead link]
^ "Microsoft, Ericsson announce strategic partnership to drive mobile Internet market". Mobic.com. 
^ "Shareholder Information – Share Graphs and Figures". Ericsson. 
^ "Ericsson Stake in Juniper". The New York Times. 18 March 1999. 
^ "Problems with Mobile Phones". History of Ericsson. 
^ "Crisis". History of Ericsson. 
^ Mukherjee, Amit S. (1 October 2008). "The Fire That Changed an Industry: A Case Study on Thriving in a Networked World". FT Press. 
^ "Sony Ericsson Mobile Communications established today - Ericsson". News.cision.com. 2001-10-01. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Svenolof Karlsson; Anders Lugn. "The first cutbacks". Ericsson History. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Svenolof Karlsson; Anders Lugn. "Second round of cuts". Ericsson History. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Svenolof Karlsson; Anders Lugn. "A new chairman of the board". Ericsson History. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Svenolof Karlsson; Anders Lugn. "Record profits". Ericsson History. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Pike, Rebecca (2003-03-17). "Business | Italians pick up first 3G mobile phones". BBC News. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Technology | 3G goes live in the UK". BBC News. 2003-03-03. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Aastra Technologies to acquire Ericsson’s Enterprise Communication Business" (Press release). Aastra. 18 February 2008. Archived from the original on 4 July 2014. Retrieved February 18, 2008. 
^ "Ericsson to divest its enterprise PBX solutions to Aastra Technologies" (Press release). Ericsson. 18 February 2008. Archived from the original on 20 December 2008. Retrieved November 7, 2008. 
^ https://www.ericsson.com/about-us
^ "Cingular HSDPA Test Successful". Phone Scoop. 2005-01-04. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "HSDPA performance and evolution". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Brian Heater, TechCrunch. “Ericsson's CEO steps down as the company begins search for a replacement.” July 25, 2016. July 25, 2016.
^ Ericsson AB. "Ericsson's Board names Börje Ekholm new President and CEO." October 26, 2016. October 26, 2016.
^ "WSI (Wireless Strategic Initiative)" (PDF). Ericsson.se. 1 May 2000. 
^ "Microsoft, Ericsson Team Up to Bring Information Anytime Anywhere, to Carriers and Consumers". Microsoft.com. 8 December 1999. Retrieved 20 June 2012. 
^ "Intel scores flash memory deal with Ericsson". cnet.com. 4 February 2000. Retrieved 20 June 2012. 
^ "Microsoft pulls out of mobile JV with Ericsson". Itworld.com. 5 October 2001. Retrieved 20 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson – press release Sony Ericsson Mobile Communications established today". Ericsson.com. 1 October 2001. Archived from the original on 9 February 2002. Retrieved 20 June 2012. 
^ "Sony to acquire Ericsson's share of Sony Ericsson– Press release". Ericsson.com. 27 Oct 2011. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Sony Completes Full Acquisition of Sony Ericsson – Press release". Sonymobile.com. 16 February 2012. Archived from the original on 31 May 2012. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Changing the World, P202, Svenolof Karlsson and Anders Lugn, Centre for Business History". Ericssonhistory.com. Retrieved 21 June 2012. [dead link]
^ "Ericsson acquires Hewlett-Packard's remaining interest in EHPT". News Powered by Cision. Retrieved 2017-02-28. 
^ "Inside the Telecom Game - How a small group of insiders made billions as the industry collapsed". Businessweek.com. 5 August 2002. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ Beltran, Luisa (22 July 2002). "WorldCom files largest bankruptcy ever". Money.cnn.com. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ Tran, Mark (22 April 2002). "Ericsson axes 17,000 jobs". London: Guardian.co.uk. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Infineon Buys Ericsson Microelectronics". Lightreading.com. 12 June 2002. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "HP News - HP Signs Contract with Ericsson for Global IT Outsourcing Services". Ssl.www8.hp.com. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Ericsson to buy most of Marconi for $2.1B". InfoWorld.com. 25 October 2005. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Saab Acquires Ericsson Microwave Systems". Defense Industry Daily. 13 Jun 2006. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson to buy Redback for $2.1 billion". Networkworld.com. 20 December 2006. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "All shares in LHS acquired – Press release". Ericsson.com. 20 Feb 2010. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson to divest its enterprise PBX solutions to Aastra Technologies – Press Release". Ericsson.com. 18 February 2008. Retrieved 22 February 2016. 
^ "Ericsson announces cash offer to acquire Tandberg Television– Press release". Ericsson.com. 26 Feb 2007. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson to acquire majority of Nortel's North American wireless business – Press release". Ericsson.com. 25 July 2009. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson to acquire Elcoteq's operations in Tallinn to secure manufacturing capacity in Estonia – Press release". Ericsson.com. 17 Jun 2009. Retrieved 21 June 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Expands Strategy and technology consulting capabilities – Press release". Ericsson.com. 7 Sep 2010. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Takes Ownership of Optimi Corporation". Technews.com. 22 December 2010. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Ericsson closes the Acquisition of GDNT, China – Press release". Ericsson.com. 12 May 2011. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Buys Nortel's Multi Service Switch Businesses". Cellular-news.com. 25 September 2010. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ "Ericsson closes Telcordia acquisition– Press release". Ericsson.com. 12 January 2012. Retrieved 20 July 2012. 
^ Rahn, Cornelius (14 June 2011). "Ericsson to Buy Telcordia for $1.2 Billion to Add Services". Bloomberg. Retrieved 9 October 2011. 
^ "divests its power cable operation to NKT Cables". Ericsson. 2013-05-03. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Ericsson to acquire leading media services company Red Bee Media" (Press release). Ericsson. 1 July 2013. Retrieved 1 July 2013. 
^ "Ericsson completes acquisition of Red Bee Media" (Press release). Ericsson. 12 May 2014. Retrieved 15 May 2014. 
^ "Ericsson closes acquisition of Microsoft Mediaroom" (Press release). Ericsson. 5 September 2013. Retrieved 3 October 2013. 
^ "Ericsson acquires majority stake in Apcera for cloud policy compliance" (Press release). PCWorld. 22 September 2014. Retrieved 22 September 2014. 
^ "Board of Directors". Ericsson. Retrieved 1 July 2016. 
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 1 January 2016. Retrieved 2016-02-05. 
^ a b "Our Research Areas". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Business and innovation". Lund University. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Early Career Program | Students & Young Professionals | Ericsson Careers". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Patents". Ericsson. 2016-11-05. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 31 December 2010. Retrieved 2016-02-05. 
^ "About our developer program". Ericsson. Archived from the original on 31 December 2010. Retrieved 9 October 2011. 
^ "Self Organizing Networks". YouTube. 4 October 2012. 
^ Cheng, Roger (12 March 2012). "How Ericsson is a resource for app developers". CNET. 
^ Degrasse, Martha (6 November 2013). "Ericsson’s role in Sprint Spark should not be underestimated". RCR Wireless News. 
^ "Company Facts". Ericsson. 
^ a b "Our Businesses". Ericsson.com. Retrieved 19 October 2014. 
^ "New business unit structure to support networks growth". Ericsson.com. Retrieved 19 October 2014. 
^ "LTE Radio Access Network". Ericsson. 2016-11-05. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Roberto Sabella. "Network Architecture Evolution: towards all-IP" (PDF). Q2s.ntnu.no. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "LTE Radio Access Network". Ericsson. 2016-11-05. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "GSM Radio Access Network". Ericsson. 2016-10-24. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "GSM still making a difference". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 4 August 2013. Retrieved 2014-07-07. 
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 26 June 2014. Retrieved 2014-07-07. 
^ "Ericsson white paper Introduction to IMS" (PDF). Facweb.iitkgp.ernet.in. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Power Modules". Ericsson. 2016-09-20. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ a b "Management". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Managed Services". Ericsson. 2016-09-12. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ a b "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 14 July 2014. Retrieved 2014-07-07. 
^ "Academy - training and consulting for the telecom and ICT industry". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Learning Services". Ericsson. 2016-08-11. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Support". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 14 July 2014. Retrieved 2014-07-07. 
^ "outlines strategy for its multimedia business". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ Ben-Aaron, Diana (21 February 2012). "Ericsson Forms Support Business Unit Around Billing Systems". Bloomberg. 
^ "Ericsson Boards Its Own BUSS". Light Reading. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Outlines New Strategic Focus". ipTVnews. Retrieved 6 March 2012. [dead link]
^ "Ericsson Teams With Western Union". Light Reading. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Announces New M-Commerce Portfolio". TelecomsTech. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ Mawad, Marie (28 February 2012). "Ericsson Turns To Mobile Wallet Amid Short-Term Uncertainty". Bloomberg. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Ericsson Announces MCommerce Deals, Picocell And In-Building Products". Mobile Europe. Archived from the original on 29 February 2012. Retrieved 6 March 2012. 
^ "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 14 July 2014. Retrieved 2014-07-07. 
^ "Network Roll-Out". Ericsson. 2016-10-13. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Archived copy" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 13 July 2015. Retrieved 2015-08-27. 
^ "Ericsson". Ericsson. 2013-09-09. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Ericsson". Ericsson.com. Retrieved 19 October 2014. 
^ "Ericsson". Ericsson. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ [1][dead link]
^ "Ericsson to shut modem business, expects savings". Investing.com. 18 September 2006. Retrieved 18 September 2014. 
^ "Sony Completes Full Acquisition of Sony Ericsson Sony to Rename the Company Sony Mobile Communications and Accelerate Business Integration". Retrieved 23 November 2016 – via sony.net. 
^ "Ericsson_lcd". Module.ro. Retrieved 9 October 2011. 
^ "ST-Ericsson born as wireless-semiconductor industry leader". Ericsson. 2009-02-12. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 4 July 2014. Retrieved 2008-02-18. 
^ "to divest its enterprise PBX solutions to Aastra Technologies". Ericsson. 2008-02-18. Retrieved 2016-11-11. 
^ dotMobi Investors | dotMobi Archived 20 August 2007 at the Wayback Machine.


Further reading[edit]

John Meurling & Richard Jeans (1994) A switch in time: AXE — creating a foundation for the information age. London: Communications Week International. ISBN 0-9524031-1-0.
John Meurling & Richard Jeans (1997). The ugly duckling. Stockholm: Ericsson Mobile Communications. ISBN 91-630-5452-3.
John Meurling & Richard Jeans (2000). The Ericsson Chronicle: 125 years in telecommunications. Stockholm: Informationsförlaget. ISBN 91-7736-464-3.
The Mobile Phone Book: The Invention of the Mobile Telephone Industry. ISBN 0-9524031-0-2
Mobile media and applications – from concept to cash: successful service creation and launch. ISBN 0-470-01747-3
Anders Pehrsson (1996). International Strategies in Telecommunications. London: Routledge Research. ISBN 0-415-14829-4

External links[edit]

Official website
General reference to all chapters on the Ericsson history: "The History of Ericsson". Center for Business History, Stockholm, and Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson. 







v
t
e


 OMX Stockholm 30 companies of Sweden






ABB
Alfa Laval
Assa Abloy
AstraZeneca
Atlas Copco
Boliden
Electrolux
Ericsson
Getinge
Hennes & Mauritz
Investor AB
Kinnevik
Lundin Petroleum
Modern Times Group
Nokia
Nordea
Sandvik
SCA
SEB
Securitas
Skanska
SKF
SSAB
Svenska Handelsbanken
Swedbank
Swedish Match
Tele2
TeliaSonera
Volvo












v
t
e


Major information technology companies






Largest IT companies
Largest Internet companies
Largest software companies





Consulting and
outsourcing



Accenture
Atos
Booz Allen Hamilton
BMC Software
BT Global Services
CACI
Capgemini
CGI Group
Cognizant
Deloitte
Digital China
DXC Technology
Fujitsu
HCL Technologies
Hitachi Consulting
IBM Global Services
Indra Sistemas
Infosys
Infor
KPMG
Leidos
NEC
NTT DATA
Orange Business Services
T-Systems
Tata Consultancy Services
Tech Mahindra
Unisys
Wipro





Imaging



Canon Inc.
HP Inc.
Eastman Kodak
Fujifilm
Konica Minolta
Kyocera
Lexmark
Nikon
Olympus Corporation
Panasonic
Ricoh
Samsung Electronics
Seiko Epson
Sharp
Sony
Toshiba
Xerox





Information storage



ADATA
Dell Technologies
Dell EMC
Fujitsu
Hitachi Data Systems
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Kingston Technology
LenovoEMC
NetApp
Oracle Corporation
Plextor
Samsung Electronics
Seagate Technology
Silicon Power
Sony
Toshiba
Transcend Information
Western Digital (SanDisk)





Internet



Baidu
Facebook
Google
IAC/InterActiveCorp
Microsoft
Naver
NetEase
Netflix
Oath
Tencent
Twitter
Uber
Vox Media
Yandex





Cloud computing




Akamai Technologies
Amazon Web Services
Google
IBM
Microsoft
Oracle Corporation
Rackspace
Salesforce.com








E-commerce only




Alibaba Group
Amazon.com
eBay
Flipkart
Groupon
JD.com
Shopify
Rakuten








Mainframes



Fujitsu
IBM





Mobile devices



Acer Inc.
Amazon.com
Apple
Asus
BBK Electronics (OPPO, OnePlus, Vivo)
BlackBerry Limited
Hisense
HTC
Huawei
I-Mobile
Karbonn Mobiles
Lava Mobiles (XOLO)
Lenovo (Motorola Mobility)
LG Electronics
Meizu
Micromax Informatics (YU Televentures)
Microsoft
Nokia
Panasonic
Samsung
Sony
TCL Corporation
True
Xiaomi
ZTE





Networking equipment



Avaya
Cisco Systems
Ericsson
Fujitsu
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
Huawei
Juniper Networks
Motorola Solutions
NEC
Nokia
Qualcomm
ZTE





OEMs



Celestica
Compal Electronics
Flextronics
Foxconn
Jabil
Pegatron
Quanta
Sanmina Corporation
TPV Technology
Wistron Corporation





Personal computers
and servers



Acer Inc.
Apple Inc.
Asus
Dell
Fujitsu
HP Inc.
Lenovo
LG Electronics
NEC
Panasonic
Positivo
Samsung Electronics
Toshiba





Servers only




Cisco Systems
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Inspur
Oracle Corporation








Financial technology



Euronet Worldwide
FIS
PayPal
Fiserv
Jack Henry
SWIFT
Square





Point of sale



Casio
NCR
Panasonic
Samsung Electronics
Seiko Epson
Sharp
Star Micronics
Toshiba
Wincor Nixdorf





Semiconductors



Advanced Micro Devices
Broadcom
Fujitsu
Infineon Technologies
Integrated Micro-Electronics, Inc.
Intel
LG Electronics
Marvell Technology Group
MediaTek
Micron Technology
Nvidia
NXP Semiconductors (Freescale)
ON Semiconductor
Panasonic
Qualcomm
Renesas Electronics
Samsung Electronics
SK Hynix
Sony
STMicroelectronics
Texas Instruments
Toshiba
VIA Technologies





Foundries




GlobalFoundries
TSMC
United Microelectronics Corporation
SMIC








Equipment




Applied Materials
KLA-Tencor
Lam Research
Tokyo Electron








Software



Adobe Systems
Amadeus IT Group
Apple Inc.
Autodesk
BMC Software
CA Technologies
FIS
Google
Hewlett Packard Enterprise
IBM
Intuit
Infor
Microsoft
Oracle Corporation
Sage Group
SAP SE
Symantec
VMware





Telecommunications
services



América Móvil
AT&T
Bell Canada
Bezeq
Bharti Airtel
Bharat Sanchar Nigam Limited
BT Group
CenturyLink
China Mobile
China Telecommunications Corporation

China Telecom


China Unicom
Chunghwa Telecom
Comcast
Deutsche Telekom
Hutchison Asia
Idea Cellular
KDDI
KPN
KT Corporation
Mahanagar Telephone Nigam
MTN
MTS
Nippon
NTT DoCoMo
Oi
Orange S.A.
PCCW
Reliance
Shaw
Singtel
SK Telecom
SoftBank Mobile
Spark
Sprint Corporation
Swisscom
Tata Teleservices
Telecom Italia
Telefónica
Telenor
Telus
Telmex
Telstra
TPG
True
Türk Telekom
Veon
Verizon
Viettel
Vivendi
Vodafone





Travel technology



Amadeus IT Group
Sabre Corporation
Travelport





Video games



Activision Blizzard
Atari
Bandai Namco
Capcom‎
Electronic Arts
Epic Games
LucasArts
Koei Tecmo
Konami
NCsoft
Nexon
Nintendo
Sega
Sony
Square Enix
Take-Two Interactive
Tencent
Ubisoft
Warner Bros.






Methodology: FY2014/15 applicable revenues of over: group 1-3, 6-12 - US$3 billion; group 4 - US$2 billion; group 5,13,16 - US$1 billion










v
t
e


Queens Park Rangers F.C. — Shirt sponsors






1983–1986: Guinness
1986–1987: Blue*Star
1987–1990: Holland/Fly KLM
1990: Influence Leisure
1990–1991: Holland/Fly KLM
1991–1992: Brooks
1992–1993: Classic FM
1993–1994: CSF
1994–1996: Compaq
1996–2001: Ericsson
2001–2003: JD Sports
2003–2006: Binatone
2006–2008: Cargiant.co.uk
2008–2011: Gulfair.co.uk
2011–2012: Malaysia Airlines
2012–: AirAsia










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Ericsson&oldid=792400308"					
Categories: 1876 establishments in SwedenCompanies based in StockholmCompanies established in 1876Companies formerly listed on the London Stock ExchangeCompanies listed on NASDAQCompanies listed on the Stockholm Stock ExchangeCompanies related to the Wallenberg familyElectronics companies of SwedenEricssonMobile phone manufacturersMultinational companies headquartered in SwedenNetworking hardware companiesSwedish brandsTelecommunications equipment vendorsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from October 2014Articles with dead external links from November 2016Webarchive template wayback linksWikipedia articles in need of updating from October 2016All Wikipedia articles in need of updatingArticles lacking reliable references from November 2016All articles lacking reliable referencesArticles needing additional references from November 2016All articles needing additional referencesEngvarB from July 2016Use dmy dates from April 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2016All articles containing potentially dated statementsArticles needing additional references from January 2016All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2016Wikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2016Articles with unsourced statements from July 2014All articles with vague or ambiguous timeVague or ambiguous time from July 2015Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoفارسیFrançais한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიҚазақшаLatviešuLietuviųMagyarمصرىNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்తెలుగుTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 26 July 2017, at 08:46.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










 Legal
















































Skip to content

Go to main navigation
Go to language selector








Ok
				This website uses cookies. If you continue to browse the site, we assume you are fine with how we use cookies on the web.
				Read More











Search freetext












TW - zh
   






Menu
More













One network for a million needs
Success for operators is built on a flexible and efficient infrastructure that enables millions of different use cases. Our network solutions help operators build offerings towards new value chains, support millions of different services and devices and work perfectly – where ever people want to connect.
Learn more about Networks

















Master the Digital Era with Programmable Platforms
Build an IT Platform that can help you boost both profitability and relevance in this customer-centric digital era.
Learn more about Ericsson IT

















Media – Entering the internet era of television
The emergence of the Networked Society is re-shaping all industries and empowering the consumer like never before. Mobility, broadband and cloud are the primary enablers of change where 15 billion connected; video enabled devices by 2020 will drive an appetite for video that will create unprecedented challenges and opportunities.
Learn more about Media

















Industries
The front-runners in industries like Utilities, Transport, Public Safety, Commercial & Industrial Real Estate and Mobile Financial Services, are starting to shift information and communications technologies from the backroom to the boardroom, from support act to main stage.
Learn about our Industry solutions

















Portfolio
Welcome to Ericsson portfolio with products, systems and solutions which enable communication for telecom operators, government media, utility and transport industries.
All Ericsson's offerings






















5G


5G will enable organizations to move into the new markets and build new revenue streams with radically new business models and use cases.

5G








Cloud


Cloud technologies bring unprecedented agility, efficiency and accessibility to IT environments in every industry.

Cloud








IoT


We are experts in IoT connectivity and security. Launch IoT safer, faster and more efficiently with our platform and accelerate your business.

Internet of Things










Welcome to the Networked Society
An extraordinary revolution is transforming our world. Real-time connectivity – from connected cars to personal wearables to smart grid technology – is fundamentally changing the way we innovate, collaborate, produce, govern and live sustainably.
Learn more about the Networked Society


















Close





Taiwan - zh,enAngola - enArgentina - es,enAustralia - enBangladesh - enBhutan - enBotswana - enBrazil - pt,enBrunei - enCameroon - en,frCanada - en,frChile - es,enChina - zh,enColombia - es,enCongo (DRC) - en,frCosta Rica - es,enCuba - enEl Salvador - enFrance - fr,enGermany - de,enGhana - enGuatemala - enHaiti - enHong Kong - enIndia - enIndonesia - enItaly - it,enIvory Coast - en,frJamaica - enJapan - en,jaKenya - enMalaysia - enMalta - enMexico - es,enMyanmar (Burma) - enNepal - enNew Zealand - enNigeria - enPanama - enParaguay - enPeru - enPhilippines - enPuerto Rico - enRussia - ru,enRwanda - enSenegal - en,frSingapore - enSouth Africa - enSpain - es,enSri Lanka - enSuriname - enSweden - sv,enSwitzerland - enTanzania - enThailand - enTurkey - tr,enUganda - enUkraine - enUnited States - enVenezuela - enVietnam - en 
Ericsson worldwide













Share on Twitter




Share on Facebook




Share on LinkedIn




Share on Mail



{ Markettagged:True , MatchedLanguageCode:True }











Home


Legal






Legal







Share on Twitter




Share on Facebook




Share on LinkedIn




Share on Mail







Copyright: 1994-2017 Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson. All rights reserved.


Terms of use
Unless otherwise stated in legal notices elsewhere on this World Wide Web server, any person is hereby authorized to view, copy, print and distribute any document published by Ericsson on its WWW server provided that it is:

for personal use
for non-commercial use
for information purposes,
and reference is made to Ericsson when the document is used.

Note that any product, process or technology described in a document on this server may be subject of other Intellectual Property Rights owned by Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson or any of its subsidiaries and not licensed hereunder. The same may apply to Intellectual Property Rights owned by others.
Trademarks








is the trademark or registered trademark of Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson. All other product or service names mentioned in a document on this server are trademarks of their respective companies.
Information policy
Information on this server is provided "as is" without any warranty of any kind, either express or implied, including but not limited to, the implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, or non-infringement.
The information herein may include technical inaccuracies or typographical errors. Changes may periodically be made to the information and will be incorporated in new editions of this document. Telefonaktiebolaget LM Ericsson may make improvements or changes in products and programs described in this publication at anytime without notice.
Certificate value statement
The purpose of this Certificate Value Statement (CVS) is to establish the minimum requirements for the issuing and use of electronic signatures within Ericsson. This CVS thus states the lowest level of administrative and security requirements in order to obtain digital signatures of different legal and organizational value.
The certificates issued in accordance with this CVS are typically suitable for verifying the identity of entities and the authenticity of digital documents and other information objects in connection with information services. Certificates issued in accordance with this CVS may be suitable for a wide range of applications primarily focusing on the following main classes of security services:

Non-repudiation: the party relying on the certificate can be confident that their counterpart cannot deny an exchange of information.
Authentication (including authentication of subscribers identity and message integrity).
Confidentiality: unauthorized persons cannot gain access to confidential information or classified systems.

Ericsson Group Certificate Value Statement
Publisher: Helena Norrman, Senior Vice President, Chief Communications Officer and Head of Group Function Communications
Our Enterprise Security
Please refer to the Enterprise Security document, which is intended to provide an overview of how Ericsson addresses the different aspects of our Enterprise Security. View the document here
Related Links
Cookies on www.ericsson.comCommenting rulesPrivacy Contact














Home


Legal






		Top of page
	






















Networks
IT
Media
Industries
Portfolio
In focus
Networked Society




About us
Contact us
News and events
Press center
Careers
Investors
Industry analysts
Policy makers
Channel Partners
Publications





+46 10 719 00 00

Find Ericsson offices


















Modern Slavery Statement
Cookies
Legal
© Ericsson AB 1994-2017




Modern Slavery Statement
Cookies
Legal
© Ericsson AB 1994-2017
















Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson - Supplier | Colombia | Import Genius
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French










			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 





Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson

Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson is an overseas supplier in Suecia that exports products to Colombia Movil S A   E S P. Transportation Type Aereo.        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database


 J Y J HYDRAULIC S.A.S                            

 GENERAL APPLIANCES&ELECTRONICS DISTRIBUITORS INC                            

 TEKNION                            

 PLASTIQUIM S.A                            

 OCEAN M S.A.S.                            
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson
Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson is an overseas supplier in Suecia that exports products to Colombia Movil S A   E S P. Transportation Type Aereo.


            Bill of Lading        





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson
TORSHAMNSGATAN 23 S-164 80 STOCKHOL


Colombia Movil S A   E S P
CR 9 A 99 02 OF 501



Acquisition
Destination



Suecia


Colombia



Product Description





                                        D.O.200.08.GE.162.1.NOS ACOGEMOS AL DECRETO 3803 DE 2006.COD. UAP 736. TELEFONOS,INCLUIDOS LOS TELEFONOS MOVILES (CELULA                                    

                                        D.O.200.08.GE.162.1.NOS ACOGEMOS AL DECRETO 3803 DE 2006.COD. UAP 736. TELEFONOS,INCLUIDOS LOS TELEFONOS MOVILES (CELULA                                    





Other Information Available




Gross Weight (KG), FOB (USD), Insurance (USD), Freight (USD), CIF (USD), Brand ID, Operation Type








Arrival Date2008-02-28Transportation TypeAereoHS Code8517621000CustomsSanta Fe de BogotaQuantity / Unit1.00/U 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson Join Now








How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Receive free shipment alerts by email whenever Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson clears a shipment through customs.                        

Processing, please wait ...







Submit












Contact Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson










 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 




Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.









Telefonaktiebolaget Lm Ericsson
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 21,508,010 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In






















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields





Schedule Live Demo







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 






Ready for a live demo?
Fill out this form and we'll contact you right away to set up a live demo of Import Genius.


Schedule Live Demo



Processing, please wait ...





Name

Tell us your Full Name


Email

Enter a valid email address


Phone

Enter valid phone number


Preferred Date

Let us know your preferred date


Preferred Time (In Your Country)

01:00 am
01:30 am
02:00 am
02:30 am
03:00 am
03:30 am
04:00 am
04:30 am
05:00 am
05:30 am
06:00 am
06:30 am
07:00 am
07:30 am
08:00 am
08:30 am
09:00 am
09:30 am
10:00 am
10:30 am
11:00 am
11:30 am
12:00 am
12:30 am
01:00 pm
01:30 pm
02:00 pm
02:30 pm
03:00 pm
03:30 pm
04:00 pm
04:30 pm
05:00 pm
05:30 pm
06:00 pm
06:30 pm
07:00 pm
07:30 pm
08:00 pm
08:30 pm
09:00 pm
09:30 pm
10:00 pm
10:30 pm
11:00 pm
11:30 pm
12:00 pm

Let us know your preferred time


Country

Required


Timezone

Required


What data are you interested in?

Let us know what you are most interested to learn



Submit



 















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Nudu & Associates, Inc                                



                                    Luis Fernando Aguirre Omante                                



                                    Scott Sport  S. A.                                



                                    Representaciones Caldega S.a.                                



                                    Import Y Export Global S.a.s.                                











                     
                                            21,508,010  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.4885
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X















